Bhikkhu Kaṭukurunde Ñāṇananda — Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled

Access status: official free-distribution PDF/HTML/audio. Seeing Through the Net hosts the 33-sermon set, HTML edition, complete download, and audio files. The 2019 library PDF states “Published strictly for free distribution” and “All Rights Reserved,” so use summary-heavy treatment and only short quotes.

1. Source Identity

Source: Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled
Author: Bhikkhu Kaṭukurunde Ñāṇananda
Form: 33 sermons on Nibbāna, originally delivered at Nissarana Vanaya between 1988 and 1991.


Lineage: Sri Lankan forest Theravāda, early Buddhist sutta hermeneutics, phenomenological Dhamma analysis.
Imaginarium use: primary source for “de-rendering” the self-world: how signs, name-and-form, consciousness, perception, contact, craving, and conceptual proliferation fabricate the lived world.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

Ñāṇananda’s Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled is the central phenomenological and dependent-arising reading of Nibbāna. It treats Nibbāna not as a metaphysical object, heaven, blank annihilation, or mystical substance, but as the stilling of the machinery that renders saṃsāric experience.

Compared with the other core sources:

Ñāṇavīra gives the existential skeleton: self-view, structure, reflexivity, contradiction.
Ṭhānissaro gives the practical breath-fabrication training.
Concept and Reality gives the theory of papañca.
The Magic of the Mind gives the illusion/magic-show model.
The Law of Dependent Arising gives the systematic causal engine.
Nāgārjuna radicalizes emptiness and dependent designation.
Visuddhimagga systematizes the path architecture.
Buddhadāsa gives immediate dependent origination.
Anālayo gives satipaṭṭhāna as direct observational method.

Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled is the capstone: the direct interpretation of cessation as the cooling, quenching, and non-establishment of the fabricated world.

3. Structure Map

Macro-structure: 33 sermons.

Functional movement:

Clarification before purification
Reframes Nibbāna against wrong views, metaphysical confusions, and inherited doctrinal fog.
Fire, cooling, and quenching
Explores the imagery of Nibbāna as extinguishing, not as nihilism but as release from fuel.
Consciousness and non-manifestation
Tracks the difficult early Buddhist language around consciousness, cessation, and non-establishment.
Name-and-form / consciousness loop
Shows how experience stabilizes as a mutually conditioning system.
Signs, concepts, and world-building
Links perception, nimitta, designation, and papañca to the fabrication of “world.”
Voidness and cessation
Moves toward emptiness as experiential deconstruction rather than philosophical slogan.
Nibbāna as the end of re-rendering
The world is not destroyed; the delusive mode of worlding is stilled.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Nibbāna as cooling	Corrects crude annihilation/eternalism readings
Fire and fuel	Explains craving/upādāna as combustible support
Contact and feeling	Shows where world-experience becomes affectively charged
Name-and-form	Maps the perceptual-symbolic body of experience
Consciousness	Treats consciousness as dependently established, not a soul-substance
Signs / nimitta	Shows how perception grips appearances
Papañca	Explains conceptual proliferation as self-world multiplication
Voidness	Shows emptiness as release from sign-bound cognition
Cessation	Frames liberation as stopping the machinery, not gaining an object
Right View	Makes interpretation itself part of practice
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
Clarification Before Purification
Why the path begins by straightening the idea of Nibbāna.
The Fire That Thinks It Is a Self
Craving as heat, fuel, continuity, and identity.
The World Is Lit by Contact
How contact gives the first ignition-point of world-experience.
Name-and-Form as Rendering Engine
The body-symbol loop that makes a world appear stable.
Consciousness Without a Throne
Why consciousness is not the hidden owner of experience.
The Tyranny of the Sign
Nimitta, perception, and the way appearances become binding.
Papañca: The Self-World Explosion
How “I,” “mine,” “world,” and “other” proliferate.
Voidness Is Not Nothingness
Emptiness as the loosening of perceptual fixation.
Nibbāna as De-Rendering
Cessation as the stilling of the constructed world.
The Mind Stilled
Final synthesis: liberation as non-establishment, cooling, and release.
6. Passage-Pack Targets

Use short, carefully chosen passages only.

Priority passage packs:

Preface / opening material on the need for “clarification before purification.”
Sermons on fire imagery and Nibbāna as extinguishing.
Sections on consciousness and non-manifestative consciousness.
Sections on name-and-form and consciousness.
Sections on signs, perception, and concepts.
Sections connecting voidness and Nibbāna.
Closing sermons that synthesize cessation and release.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Re-rendering of world	Very high	Best source for Buddhist deconstruction of world-appearance
Selfing loop	Very high	Craving, conceit, signs, and papañca
Dependent arising	High	Less systematic than Law of Dependent Arising, but deeply applied
Perception as construction	Very high	Strong through nimitta/name-and-form
Imaginal illusion	High	Pair with Magic of the Mind
Emptiness	High	Early Buddhist voidness, not Madhyamaka scholasticism
Practice architecture	Medium	Not a manual like Ṭhānissaro or Visuddhimagga
Meditation phenomenology	High	Especially for advanced interpretive framing
Ethical/social path	Lower	Not the main emphasis
Ritual/devotional material	Low	Not relevant here
8. Editorial Review

This source should be treated as a master interpretive spine, not merely one Buddhist book among others. It is perfect for Imaginarium because it translates Nibbāna into a precise deconstruction of how experience becomes world, how world becomes self, and how self-world loses its fuel.

Avoid making it sound mystical in a vague way. Ñāṇananda is not saying “reality is imagination” in a loose esoteric sense. He is showing how experience, under ignorance, is dependently rendered through contact, perception, sign, craving, designation, and consciousness.

9. Variety Review

To prevent repetition across essays:

Do not always start from “Nibbāna means extinguishing.”
Alternate between fire imagery, consciousness analysis, sign theory, name-and-form, voidness, and papañca.
Pair with different companion sources:
With Ñāṇavīra for existential structure.
With Nāgārjuna for emptiness.
With Ṭhānissaro for fabrication/practice.
With Levin-style cognition for rendering models.
With Corbin only cautiously, as contrast: imaginal ontology vs Buddhist de-imaginalization.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not a beginner meditation manual.
Not primarily devotional.
Not a complete ethical/path encyclopedia.
Not Madhyamaka dialectics.
Not Abhidhamma system-building.
Requires strong Pāli/sutta context to avoid misreading.

Patch with:

Ṭhānissaro for practical breath training.
Anālayo for satipaṭṭhāna.
Visuddhimagga for system architecture.
Nāgārjuna for emptiness dialectic.
Buddhadāsa for immediate dependent origination.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next run should ideally cover:

Ñāṇavīra Thera — Notes on Dhamma / Clearing the Path
Use it as the severe structural crosscheck for self-view, contradiction, intention, temporality, and dependent arising. Then return to Ñāṇananda with sharper existential precision.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Ñāṇavīra Thera — Notes on Dhamma / Clearing the Path

Access status: official free HTML/PDF. Nanavira.org hosts Notes on Dhamma, Letters, and downloadable PDFs; one PDF edition states it may be freely downloaded, stored, printed, and copied for free distribution, but not commercially.

1. Source Identity

Source: Notes on Dhamma, contained in Clearing the Path
Author: Ñāṇavīra Thera
Form: compressed analytical notes plus letters/commentarial clarifications.
Core aim: to correct what Ñāṇavīra sees as traditional and modern misreadings of the Pāli suttas; the text says its aim is to point out “current misinterpretations” and offer something “less easy but perhaps also less inadequate.”


Imaginarium use: the severe structural crosscheck for self-view, dependent arising, reflexivity, temporality, contradiction, and the existential mechanics of appropriation.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

Ñāṇavīra is not the warm, expansive phenomenologist like Ñāṇananda. He is the razor. His function in the lineage is to prevent the project from becoming soft metaphysics, vague mysticism, or symbolic overreach.

Where Ñāṇananda shows the world as dependently rendered through signs, contact, name-and-form, and consciousness, Ñāṇavīra asks: who is taking this structure personally? Where is the assumption of self already built into the analysis?

Compared with the other sources:

With Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled, he supplies existential severity.
With Concept and Reality, he sharpens papañca into self-involvement.
With The Law of Dependent Arising, he insists dependent arising is immediate structure, not just cosmological sequence.
With Ṭhānissaro, he gives a philosophical skeleton beneath fabrication practice.
With Nāgārjuna, he shares anti-substantialist force, but remains closer to early Buddhist existential analysis.
Against Visuddhimagga, he often functions as a critical counterweight to scholastic systematization.
3. Structure Map

Macro-structure:

Preface
Declares the polemical and corrective aim: return to the suttas with exactness.
A Note on Paṭiccasamuppāda
The central engine: dependent arising as the structure of experience and suffering.
Paramattha Sacca
Critiques certain ways of treating “ultimate truth” as a metaphysical inventory.
Shorter Notes
Compressed entries on phassa, rūpa, sakkāya, saṅkhāra, saññā, viññāṇa, anicca, attā, cetanā, citta, dhamma, kamma, mano, and related terms. Nanavira.org lists these as individual sections.

Letters
Practical commentary on the Notes, including clarifications of dependent arising and critiques of commentarial assumptions. Nanavira.org notes that the letters discuss, among other things, the claim that there is “only one Dependent Arising formulation.”

4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Paṭiccasamuppāda	Dependent arising as present existential structure
Sakkāya	The lived body/personality as appropriated self-complex
Attā / self-view	The reflexive assumption of ownership
Viññāṇa	Consciousness as structurally implicated, not a soul
Nāma-rūpa	The polarity of experience: intelligibility and material presence
Phassa	Contact as the structural meeting point
Saṅkhāra	Determination, intention, fabrication, situatedness
Cetanā	Intention as existential directionality
Anicca	Instability as structural inadequacy, not mere change
Paramattha critique	Refusal to turn Dhamma into metaphysical object-catalogue
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Razor of Right View
Ñāṇavīra as anti-comfort Dhamma.
Dependent Arising Is Not a Story
Paṭiccasamuppāda as immediate structure, not merely mythic timeline.
Sakkāya: The Body Taken Personally
How the self-world forms around appropriation.
The Reflexive Trap
Why the self cannot be found because it is the structure of looking.
Consciousness Without Refuge
Viññāṇa as implicated in dependence, not the hidden witness.
Intention as World-Binding
Cetanā and saṅkhāra as directional fabrication.
Against Buddhist Metaphysics
The critique of “ultimate truth” as spiritual objectification.
Anicca as Existential Pressure
Impermanence not as fact-list, but as the impossibility of secure possession.
Ñāṇavīra and Ñāṇananda
Structure and sign: the existential and phenomenological wings.
Clearing the Path for De-Rendering
Why the rendered world collapses only when self-view is structurally seen.
6. Passage-Pack Targets

Use short extracts only.

Priority packs:

Preface — aim of correcting misinterpretation.
A Note on Paṭiccasamuppāda — core dependent-arising formulation.
Sakkāya note — personality/body as appropriated structure.
Viññāṇa note — consciousness without metaphysical refuge.
Saṅkhāra / Cetanā notes — fabrication and intention.
Anicca note — instability and non-ownership.
Letters on dependent arising — clarifying relation between theory and practice.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Selfing loop	Very high	Probably the strongest source in the set
Dependent arising	Very high	Radical present-structure reading
Perception as construction	Medium-high	Less imagistic than Ñāṇananda
Papañca	Medium	Implicit through self-view, less central than Concept and Reality
Emptiness	Medium	Not Madhyamaka-style; more existential non-ownership
Nibbāna	Medium-high	Mostly by clearing wrong structure
Fabrication	High	Saṅkhāra/cetanā are key
Meditation method	Low-medium	Not a practice manual
Anti-metaphysics	Very high	Essential for project hygiene
Imaginarium relevance	High	Supplies the “do not reify the rendering” safeguard
8. Editorial Review

Ñāṇavīra should be used as the severity engine of the Buddhist companion volume.

He prevents three common corruptions:

Turning Dhamma into metaphysical speculation.
Treating dependent arising as a merely historical/cosmological chain.
Talking about “de-rendering” while secretly preserving a self who owns the process.

He is difficult, sometimes brittle, and not always the best first teacher. But as a structural critic, he is indispensable.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetitive essays:

Do not always frame him as “existential Buddhism.”
Rotate between paṭiccasamuppāda, sakkāya, cetanā, viññāṇa, anicca, and paramattha critique.
Pair him with:
Ñāṇananda for signs/world-rendering.
Buddhadāsa for immediate dependent origination.
Nāgārjuna for anti-essentialism.
Ṭhānissaro for practical fabrication.
Anālayo for observational mindfulness.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not a gentle introduction.
Not a meditation manual.
Not rich in devotional or imaginal language.
Not ideal for historical Buddhism coverage.
Can become too conceptual if not grounded in practice.

Patch with:

With Each & Every Breath for embodied method.
Satipaṭṭhāna for observation.
Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled for phenomenological breadth.
Concept and Reality for papañca.
Visuddhimagga for path architecture.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source should be:

Ṭhānissaro Bhikkhu — With Each & Every Breath

Why: after Ñāṇavīra’s severity, the system needs a practice-facing counterweight: breath, fabrication, calming, intention, alertness, and the body as the training-ground where the selfing loop can actually be worked with.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Ṭhānissaro Bhikkhu — With Each & Every Breath

Access status: official free PDF/HTML/audio via dhammatalks.org. The book page says it was published January 18, 2013 and revised June 3, 2021; it is available in EPUB, Kindle, PDF, audiobook, Kobo, and online reading formats.

1. Source Identity

Source: With Each & Every Breath: A Guide to Meditation
Author: Ṭhānissaro Bhikkhu / Geoffrey DeGraff
Form: practical meditation manual.
Lineage: Thai Forest, especially Ajaan Lee Dhammadharo’s breath method, combined with the Buddha’s breath instructions. Dhammatalks describes the book as drawing on both the Buddha’s breath-training instructions and Ajaan Lee’s method.


Imaginarium use: the practical fabrication manual: how attention, breath, perception, feeling, evaluation, intention, and bodily ease become trainable components of the rendered self-world.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

Ṭhānissaro’s role in this source-map is practice architecture.

Where Ñāṇananda explains the rendered world through signs, contact, name-and-form, consciousness, and cessation, Ṭhānissaro gives the embodied training interface: breath, alertness, intention, evaluation, perception, and calm.

Where Ñāṇavīra gives the razor of self-view, Ṭhānissaro gives the workshop: not just “see fabrication,” but learn to fabricate skillfully enough that the mind can settle, observe, release, and understand.

Compared with the other sources:

Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled = de-rendering theory of cessation.
Notes on Dhamma = structural/existential critique.
With Each & Every Breath = trainable fabrication in the body-mind.
Concept and Reality = papañca and conceptual proliferation.
Magic of the Mind = perceptual illusion and consciousness as magic-show.
Law of Dependent Arising = causal architecture.
MMK = emptiness dialectic.
Visuddhimagga = classical path encyclopedia.
Buddhadāsa = immediate dependent origination.
Anālayo = close satipaṭṭhāna observation.
3. Structure Map

Macro-structure: meditation guide moving from basic motivation and instructions into daily-life integration, deeper concentration, discernment, and further resources.

Functional movement:

Meditation: What & Why
Establishes meditation as training: not passive relaxation, but developing the mind’s strengths.
Basic Instructions
Breath as primary object; establish comfort, steadiness, whole-body awareness, and skillful adjustment.
Working with Fabrication
Breath practice brings together bodily, verbal, and mental fabrication: breath, directed thought/evaluation, perception, and feeling.

Meditation in Daily Life
Extends inner focus into activity: maintaining focus while engaging with tasks and surroundings.

Deepening Concentration
Uses comfort and whole-body breath awareness to gather the mind.
Discernment and Release
Breath becomes the field where stress, clinging, intention, and fabrication can be known.
Companion Talks
Dhammatalks also provides a companion talk collection keyed to the chapters.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Breath	Primary bodily interface for training
Fabrication	Shows experience as made, shaped, adjusted
Alertness	Knowing what is happening as it happens
Ardency	The energy of skillful effort
Mindfulness	Remembering the frame and staying with the task
Evaluation	Adjusting breath, perception, and effort intelligently
Whole-body awareness	Re-rendering the body as one breathable field
Feeling-tone	Learning how pleasure/ease affect attention
Perception	Using intentional labels/images of breath skillfully
Daily life	Extending practice beyond the cushion
Concentration	Gathering the mind around ease and steadiness
Discernment	Seeing fabrication clearly enough to release clinging
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Breath as Rendering Interface
Breath is not merely air; it is the body-mind field where attention, feeling, and perception meet.
Fabrication Is Trainable
The point is not to stop constructing immediately, but to construct skillfully.
Whole-Body Breath and the Re-Mapped Body
The body becomes a unified field of sensation rather than a fragmented object.
Evaluation as Sacred Engineering
Directed thought and evaluation are not distractions at first; they are tools.
Pleasure as a Path Factor
Ease stabilizes attention and gives the mind a better place to feed.
The End of Passive Meditation
Ṭhānissaro’s method is active, experimental, and responsive.
Breath, Perception, and Sign
How changing the perception of breath changes the experienced body-world.
Meditation in Daily Life
Re-rendering attention while walking, speaking, working, and reacting.
From Calm to Discernment
Concentration is not escape; it is a laboratory for seeing stress and fabrication.
Skillful Fabrication Before De-Fabrication
The Buddhist path as using construction to reach release from compulsive construction.
6. Passage-Pack Targets

Use short extracts only.

Priority packs:

Introduction: Meditation: What & Why
Meditation as training the mind.
Basic Instructions
Establishing breath, comfort, whole-body awareness, and steadiness.
Three Fabrications Passage
Key passage where breath practice brings bodily, verbal, and mental fabrication together.
Working and Playing with the Breath
Breath as experimental field, not rigid object.
Meditation in Daily Life
Maintaining inner focus amid activity.
Jhana / Concentration Sections
Breath pleasure and whole-body ease as concentration base.
Discernment Sections
Seeing stress, clinging, intention, and release through the trained field.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Fabrication	Very high	Core strength
Embodied practice	Very high	Best source in the set for this
Breath as interface	Very high	Breath links body, mind, intention
Perception as trainable	High	Perceptions of breath shape experience
Selfing loop	Medium-high	Practical rather than theoretical
Dependent arising	Medium	Implied through fabrication/stress
Papañca	Medium-low	Not the main lens
Nibbāna	Medium	Path-oriented, not doctrinally expansive
Concentration	Very high	Strong practical architecture
Daily-life integration	High	Explicitly treated
De-rendering	High	Through skillful fabrication leading to release
8. Editorial Review

This source should function as the embodied training manual of the Buddhist companion volume.

It prevents the project from becoming merely intellectual. Ñāṇananda and Ñāṇavīra can show the structure of delusion, but Ṭhānissaro shows where the structure can be trained: in breath, attention, perception, effort, evaluation, and bodily feeling.

For the Imaginarium frame, the key insight is:

The rendered self-world is not only analyzed; it is re-trained through skillful fabrication.

Do not present this as dreamy breath mysticism. The strength of the text is its pragmatic intelligence: adjust, observe, evaluate, settle, refine, release.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Do not reduce every essay to “watch the breath.”
Rotate between fabrication, whole-body awareness, perception, comfort, effort, evaluation, daily life, and discernment.
Pair with:
Ñāṇananda for cessation and sign-theory.
Ñāṇavīra for self-view and existential structure.
Buddhadāsa for immediate dependent origination.
Anālayo for satipaṭṭhāna comparison.
Visuddhimagga for jhāna/path architecture.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not a full philosophical treatment of dependent arising.
Not focused on papañca.
Not a Madhyamaka emptiness text.
Not a historical survey.
Not a comprehensive Theravāda encyclopedia like Visuddhimagga.
It may under-serve readers looking for abstract metaphysical critique.

Patch with:

Ñāṇananda’s Concept and Reality for papañca.
Ñāṇananda’s Law of Dependent Arising for causal structure.
Ñāṇavīra for self-view.
Nāgārjuna for emptiness.
Anālayo for comparative mindfulness scholarship.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source should be:

Ñāṇananda — Concept and Reality in Early Buddhist Thought

Why: after embodied fabrication, the next layer should be conceptual proliferation: how perception becomes sign, sign becomes concept, concept becomes “world,” and world becomes the domain where self-view multiplies.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Ñāṇananda — Concept and Reality in Early Buddhist Thought

Access status: official/free-distribution PDF lineage. The revised edition is “strictly for free distribution,” with sale/profit prohibited; best handled summary-heavy with only short quotations.

1. Source Identity

Full title: Concept and Reality in Early Buddhist Thought: An Essay on Papañca and Papañca-Saññā-Saṅkhā
Author: Bhikkhu Kaṭukurunde Ñāṇananda
Original publication: Buddhist Publication Society, 1971; later revised free-distribution editions.


Core function: the key early Buddhist study of papañca: conceptual proliferation, distortion, designation, perceptual construction, and the self-world spun out through language and craving.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

This is Ñāṇananda’s conceptual-proliferation engine.

Where Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled gives the grand de-rendering of Nibbāna, Concept and Reality isolates one of the main mechanisms by which the rendering becomes binding: papañca.

Compared with the other sources:

Ñāṇavīra gives the existential structure of self-view.
Ṭhānissaro gives trainable fabrication through breath.
Concept and Reality shows how concept, perception, sign, and language generate the self-world.
Magic of the Mind dramatizes the same process as perceptual enchantment.
Law of Dependent Arising supplies the causal architecture.
Nāgārjuna expands the anti-reification into Madhyamaka emptiness.
Visuddhimagga systematizes path, jhāna, and insight.
Buddhadāsa makes dependent arising immediate.
Anālayo supplies satipaṭṭhāna as direct observation.
3. Structure Map

Macro-structure: a compact scholarly-commentarial essay.

Functional movement:

Problem setup
“Concept” and “reality” are not neutral categories. Ordinary experience is already conceptually mediated.
Papañca and papañca-saññā-saṅkhā
Defines the key doctrinal terms: proliferation and the perceptions/notions born from proliferation.
Sutta basis
Uses early Buddhist discourses to show how perception, contact, feeling, craving, and self-reference generate proliferated thought.
Conceptual distortion
Shows how language and designation harden fluid experience into “things,” “selves,” and “world.”
Not-self deepened
Not-self is not just “there is no soul”; it is a critique of the conceptual machinery that keeps producing self-world.
Commentarial and scholarly review
Later interpretations are examined and corrected where they obscure the experiential force of papañca.
Mahāyāna bridge
The text includes discussion of prapañca in Mahāyāna Buddhism, making it useful as a bridge toward Nāgārjuna.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Papañca	Central engine of conceptual proliferation
Papañca-saññā-saṅkhā	Perceptions/notions structured by proliferation
Saññā	Perception as selective marking and recognition
Concept	The mind’s abstracting and naming activity
Reality	What is obscured when concepts are taken as final
Language	Designation as world-hardening
Self-view	The “I-making” hidden in conceptual activity
Contact-feeling-craving	Affective trigger of proliferation
Not-self	Deconstruction of conceptual ownership
Emptiness bridge	Early Buddhist precondition for Madhyamaka anti-reification
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
Papañca: The Explosion of the Self-World
Conceptual proliferation as the mind’s expansion of contact into a world-for-me.
Perception Is Already Interpretation
Saññā as marking, selecting, and preparing experience for appropriation.
The Tyranny of Naming
How designation freezes process into object.
Concepts That Bite Back
Concepts are useful tools until they become realities that dominate perception.
The Birth of “I” in Language
How self-reference is smuggled into the structure of thought.
Contact Becomes Story
From phassa to feeling to craving to proliferated narrative.
Not-Self as Anti-Conceptual Surgery
Anattā as dismantling the concepts that pretend to own experience.
From Papañca to Madhyamaka
Why Nāgārjuna’s critique of intrinsic existence extends this early Buddhist line.
The Rendered World
How papañca maps directly onto the Imaginarium’s model of world-rendering.
Silence After Proliferation
Nibbāna as the cooling of proliferative construction.
6. Passage-Pack Targets

Use short passages only.

Priority packs:

Opening explanation of concept vs reality.
Definitions and discussion of papañca.
Discussion of papañca-saññā-saṅkhā.
Sutta analysis around contact, perception, and proliferation.
Sections on not-self and conceptual distortion.
Commentarial interpretation section.
Mahāyāna/prapañca comparison section.
Closing synthesis on the practical significance of seeing through concepts.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Papañca	Very high	Core source
Perception as construction	Very high	Saññā and concept formation
Language as rendering	Very high	Naming hardens world
Selfing loop	High	“I” emerges through proliferated appropriation
Dependent arising	Medium-high	Present through contact-feeling-craving-proliferation
Emptiness	Medium-high	Strong bridge to Nāgārjuna
Nibbāna	Medium	Mostly implied through cessation of proliferation
Meditation method	Low-medium	Not a manual
Phenomenology	High	Strong analysis of experience-formation
De-rendering	Very high	The conceptual layer of de-rendering
8. Editorial Review

This source is essential because it explains why the world feels so solid.

The Imaginarium model says ordinary consciousness is a conditioned rendering regime. Concept and Reality gives the Buddhist version of that mechanism: perception marks, language names, concepts proliferate, craving appropriates, and the self-world appears obvious.

This is the bridge between Dhamma and the project’s “rendering” language.

The key editorial warning: do not turn papañca into “thinking too much” in a shallow self-help sense. Papañca is deeper: it is the conceptual-affective expansion of experience around self-reference.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Do not make every essay “concepts are bad.”
Show the nuance: concepts are functional, but become delusive when reified.
Rotate between perception, language, designation, craving, self-reference, and emptiness.
Pair with:
Ñāṇavīra for self-view.
Ñāṇananda’s Nibbāna sermons for cessation.
Magic of the Mind for perceptual illusion.
Nāgārjuna for anti-essentialist dialectic.
Anālayo for observing perception and dhammas directly.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not a full meditation manual.
Not a complete dependent-arising system.
Not a jhāna/path encyclopedia.
Less practical than Ṭhānissaro.
Less existentially severe than Ñāṇavīra.
Less expansive on Nibbāna than The Mind Stilled.

Patch with:

The Magic of the Mind for illusion/perception.
The Law of Dependent Arising for causal structure.
With Each & Every Breath for practice.
Nāgārjuna for emptiness.
Anālayo for satipaṭṭhāna observation.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source should be:

Ñāṇananda — The Magic of the Mind

Why: after Concept and Reality explains conceptual proliferation, The Magic of the Mind gives the perceptual-mystery layer: consciousness as magician, experience as conjuring, and the Kalakarama Sutta as a profound analysis of seeing without enchantment.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Ñāṇananda — The Magic of the Mind

Access status: official free-distribution PDF via Seeing Through the Net; also available through BPS PDF hosting. The PDF states it is “published strictly for free distribution,” so use summary-heavy treatment and only short quotes.

1. Source Identity

Full title: The Magic of the Mind: An Exposition of the Kālakārāma Sutta
Author: Bhikkhu Kaṭukurunde Ñāṇananda
Original BPS edition: 1972; later revised free-distribution editions.
Core function: a compact study of perception, consciousness, illusion, and release through the Kālakārāma Sutta.

This is the perceptual-enchantment source: how consciousness, name-and-form, signs, and viewpoints generate a convincing “magic show” of world-experience.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

This source sits between Concept and Reality and Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled.

Concept and Reality explains conceptual proliferation.
The Magic of the Mind shows the lived perceptual illusion: consciousness as magician, the world as conjuring.
Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled expands this into the full de-rendering of Nibbāna.

Compared with the rest:

Ñāṇavīra gives the existential skeleton.
Ṭhānissaro gives trainable fabrication.
Law of Dependent Arising gives causal mechanics.
Nāgārjuna gives emptiness dialectic.
Visuddhimagga gives path-system architecture.
Buddhadāsa gives immediate dependent origination.
Anālayo gives satipaṭṭhāna observation.
3. Structure Map

Macro-structure: a short exposition around the Kālakārāma Sutta.

Functional movement:

The Buddha’s strange mode of knowing
The Kālakārāma Sutta presents a radically non-grasping relation to seen, heard, sensed, and cognized.
Consciousness as magician
Experience appears as if stable, external, and self-evident, but this apparent solidity is constructed.
Name-and-form as the net
Consciousness is caught in the net of name-and-form when it takes objects as arresting points of fixation.
The collapse of viewpoint
Liberation is not a superior viewpoint; it is release from viewpoint-making.
Seeing without conceit
The arahant sees without constructing a seer, a seen thing, or a “thing worth seeing.”
Release from enchantment
The magic show is not destroyed as an object; its spell is understood.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Kālakārāma Sutta	Root discourse for non-grasping cognition
Magic-show metaphor	Central model of perceptual enchantment
Consciousness	The conjuring principle when bound to objects
Name-and-form	The net through which consciousness becomes world-bound
Viewpoint	The hidden stance that makes experience personal
Seen/heard/sensed/cognized	Total field of sensory-cognitive experience
Conceit	The subtle “I am” behind perception
Non-manifestative consciousness	Difficult liberation-language around unestablished consciousness
Voidness	Release from thingness, seerhood, and object-fixation
De-enchantment	Seeing through the trick without metaphysical inflation
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Mind as Magician
How consciousness produces a convincing show without needing a hidden self behind it.
The Kālakārāma Shock
Why the Buddha’s relation to seen, heard, sensed, and cognized breaks ordinary knowing.
The Net of Name-and-Form
How experience becomes capturable, nameable, and inhabitable.
Viewpoint Is the Trap
The problem is not simply wrong views, but the very taking up of a position.
Seeing Without a Seer
Perception after the collapse of ownership.
The Object as Spell
How the mind arrests itself on appearances.
Consciousness Without Landing
Unestablished consciousness as release from object-support, not mystical substance.
From Magic to Papañca
Pairing this source with Concept and Reality: illusion becomes proliferation.
From Magic to Nibbāna
Pairing this source with The Mind Stilled: de-enchantment becomes cessation.
The End of the Rendered Theatre
Imaginarium synthesis: liberation as seeing through the staged self-world.
6. Passage-Pack Targets

Use short extracts only.

Priority packs:

Kālakārāma Sutta base passage — seen, heard, sensed, cognized.
Magic-show metaphor — consciousness as illusion-producing.
Name-and-form net — consciousness caught by objectification.
Viewpoint passages — the replacement of fixed standpoints by release.
Seer/seen analysis — no conceit of seer, object, or object-worth.
Non-manifestative consciousness passages — handle carefully, summary-first.
Closing practical synthesis — seeing through the trick.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Perception as illusion	Very high	Core source
Consciousness as rendering	Very high	Magic-show model
Name-and-form	High	Treated as net/structure
Signs and objects	High	Object as arresting point
Selfing loop	High	Seer/seen conceit
Papañca	Medium-high	Strong bridge to Concept and Reality
Dependent arising	Medium	Present through name-and-form/consciousness
Emptiness/voidness	High	Seen as release from object-fixation
Nibbāna	High	Through unbinding from the magic show
Practice method	Low-medium	Not a manual; interpretive/phenomenological
8. Editorial Review

This source is one of the best Imaginarium bridges because it speaks the language of appearance, illusion, enchantment, and release without becoming loose mysticism.

The core editorial framing:

Ordinary experience is not false in the crude sense; it is enchanted. The error is not that nothing appears, but that appearances are taken as self-evident, owned, and worth clinging to.

For Path of Re-Rendering, this gives the Buddhist equivalent of “the rendered theatre”: the mind stages a world, inhabits it, and then suffers inside its own show.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Do not reduce the whole source to “life is illusion.”
Keep the precision: illusion means misapprehension, fixation, conceit, and viewpoint-making.
Rotate essays between consciousness, name-and-form, viewpoint, object-fixation, non-seer perception, and de-enchantment.
Pair with:
Concept and Reality for papañca.
Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled for cessation.
Ñāṇavīra for self-view.
Nāgārjuna for emptiness.
Anālayo for direct observation of perception.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not a full dependent-arising manual.
Not a breath meditation guide.
Not a full path encyclopedia.
Not primarily about ethics or devotion.
The “non-manifestative consciousness” material is easy to reify if handled badly.

Patch with:

The Law of Dependent Arising for causal architecture.
With Each & Every Breath for practice.
Notes on Dhamma for existential self-view.
Nāgārjuna for anti-reification.
Satipaṭṭhāna for observational method.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source should be:

Ñāṇananda — The Law of Dependent Arising

Why: after the magic-show model, the next layer should be the full causal machinery: contact, feeling, craving, name-and-form, consciousness, bondage, release, and how the rendered world maintains itself moment by moment.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Ñāṇananda — The Law of Dependent Arising

Access status: official free-distribution PDF via Seeing Through the Net. The PDF states it is “published strictly for free distribution” and that profit/material gain is prohibited, so use summary-heavy treatment and only short quotations.

1. Source Identity

Full title: The Law of Dependent Arising: The Secret of Bondage and Release
Author: Bhikkhu Kaṭukurunde Ñāṇananda
Form: systematic Dhamma exposition on paṭicca-samuppāda.
Core function: the causal architecture source: how ignorance, formations, consciousness, name-and-form, contact, feeling, craving, clinging, becoming, birth, ageing-and-death form the machinery of bondage — and how their cessation opens release.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

This is Ñāṇananda’s dependent-arising engine.

Concept and Reality explains conceptual proliferation.
The Magic of the Mind shows perceptual enchantment.
Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled shows cessation as de-rendering.
The Law of Dependent Arising shows the actual mechanism: how the rendered world is generated, maintained, and released.

Compared with the others:

Ñāṇavīra = existential structure.
Ṭhānissaro = trainable fabrication.
Nāgārjuna = emptiness dialectic.
Visuddhimagga = encyclopaedic path map.
Buddhadāsa = radical immediacy of dependent origination.
Anālayo = mindfulness observation of the arising process.
3. Structure Map

Functional movement:

Dependent arising as noble norm
Not a theory of the universe first, but a penetrative law of bondage and release.
Ignorance and formations
Ignorance does not simply lack data; it mis-structures experience. Formations carry that mis-structuring forward.
Consciousness and name-and-form
The central feedback loop: consciousness depends on name-and-form, and name-and-form depends on consciousness.
Six sense bases, contact, feeling
The world becomes experiential through contact; feeling gives affective charge.
Craving and clinging
Feeling becomes thirst; thirst becomes appropriation.
Becoming and birth
Identity-worlds are enacted, inhabited, and renewed.
Ageing-and-death / sorrow / despair
The cost of taking the constructed process personally.
Cessation sequence
Liberation is the fading of fuel, not the destruction of a metaphysical self.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Ignorance	Mis-seeing that structures the whole system
Saṅkhāra	Fabrications/intentional formations
Consciousness	Dependently established knowing
Name-and-form	Psychophysical rendering matrix
Six sense bases	Openings of world-contact
Contact	Ignition-point of lived experience
Feeling	Affective tone that invites craving
Craving	Thirst for continuation, pleasure, existence, non-existence
Clinging	Appropriation and identity-hardening
Becoming	Enacted world/self continuity
Birth	Arising of identity-position
Cessation	Deactivation of the chain through wisdom
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
Dependent Arising as Rendering Law
Paṭicca-samuppāda as the Buddhist grammar of world-generation.
Ignorance Is Not Mere Confusion
Ignorance as the hidden operating system of self-world.
Fabrications Carry the Spell Forward
Saṅkhāra as conditioned patterning, intention, and karmic momentum.
The Vortical Loop of Consciousness and Name-and-Form
The central feedback mechanism of experiential reality.
The World Begins at Contact
How the senses, object, and consciousness produce lived world.
Feeling: The Fork in the Chain
Vedanā as the moment where experience can become craving or wisdom.
Craving as World-Renewal
How thirst keeps the rendered world lit.
Clinging and Becoming
How identity-worlds are appropriated and inhabited.
Birth as Re-Identification
Birth as the arising of a position, role, or self-world.
Cessation as De-Rendering
The reversal of bondage through the fading of ignorance and craving.
6. Passage-Pack Targets

Use short passages only.

Priority packs:

Opening framing of dependent arising as bondage and release.
Ignorance → formations section.
Consciousness ↔ name-and-form mutuality.
Six bases → contact → feeling.
Feeling → craving → clinging.
Becoming and birth.
Cessation sequence.
Any sections distinguishing immediate experiential dependent arising from crude linear/cosmological reading.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Dependent arising	Very high	Core source
Selfing loop	Very high	Craving/clinging/becoming/birth
Perception as construction	High	Through contact and name-and-form
Consciousness as rendering	Very high	Consciousness/name-and-form loop
Fabrication	High	Saṅkhāra as conditioned construction
Feeling-tone	Very high	Vedanā as decisive hinge
Papañca	Medium-high	Not central term, but mechanism supports it
Nibbāna	High	Through cessation of the chain
Emptiness	Medium-high	Implied as absence of independent essence
Practice architecture	Medium	More doctrinal-mechanistic than manual
8. Editorial Review

This source is the mechanical heart of the Buddhist blueprint.

For Path of Re-Rendering, it gives the cleanest Dhamma model of how the rendered world maintains itself:

ignorance → fabrication → consciousness → name-and-form → contact → feeling → craving → clinging → becoming → birth → suffering.

The crucial editorial move is not to treat this as a dead twelve-link chart. It should be read dynamically: a living loop by which experience becomes world, world becomes desirable/threatening, desire becomes appropriation, and appropriation becomes identity.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Do not make every essay a generic twelve-link explanation.
Give each link its own phenomenological texture.
Keep alternating between:
causal architecture,
lived experience,
selfing,
perception,
affect,
identity,
cessation.
Pair with:
Ñāṇavīra for existential immediacy.
Ñāṇananda’s Nibbāna sermons for cessation.
Concept and Reality for papañca.
Magic of the Mind for perceptual illusion.
Buddhadāsa for immediate dependent origination.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not a full breath meditation manual.
Not a complete jhāna/path encyclopedia.
Not mainly a satipaṭṭhāna commentary.
Not a Madhyamaka emptiness dialectic.
Can become diagrammatic if not grounded in lived phenomenology.

Patch with:

With Each & Every Breath for bodily practice.
Satipaṭṭhāna: The Direct Path for observation.
Nāgārjuna’s MMK for emptiness.
Visuddhimagga for classical map.
Ñāṇavīra for structural severity.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source should be:

Nāgārjuna — Mūlamadhyamakakārikā

Why: after dependent arising as causal mechanics, the next expansion should be emptiness as anti-reification: if things arise dependently, they cannot possess intrinsic existence. This gives the project its strongest philosophical weapon against treating the rendered world as ultimately solid.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Nāgārjuna — Mūlamadhyamakakārikā

Access status: root Sanskrit text is freely accessible through Digital Sanskrit Buddhist Canon and GRETIL-style reference texts; scanned editions also exist on Internet Archive. English translations by Garfield, Kalupahana, Siderits/Katsura, and others are generally copyrighted or ambiguously hosted, so this blueprint should be summary-heavy, using chapter structure and short verse references rather than importing long translation passages.

1. Source Identity

Source: Mūlamadhyamakakārikā, “Root Verses on the Middle Way”
Author: Nāgārjuna
Form: 27-chapter verse treatise.
Lineage: foundational Madhyamaka text of Mahāyāna Buddhist philosophy. Google Books describes it as the foundational text of the Madhyamaka school and a touchstone presentation of emptiness.


Core function: the anti-reification blade: if all things arise dependently, nothing stands by its own intrinsic essence.

For Imaginarium, this is the source that prevents “rendering” from becoming a subtle metaphysical substance. The rendered world is empty; the rendering process is empty; emptiness itself is empty.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

Nāgārjuna is the radical emptiness expansion of dependent arising.

Where Ñāṇananda shows the world as dependently rendered through contact, name-and-form, consciousness, signs, and cessation, Nāgārjuna dismantles the philosophical assumption that anything in that rendered field possesses self-existence.

Where Ñāṇavīra refuses consoling metaphysics, Nāgārjuna performs the same refusal through dialectic: cause, motion, self, time, aggregates, bondage, release, saṃsāra, and nirvāṇa are all unfindable as intrinsically existing entities.

Compared with the other sources:

Ñāṇananda’s Nibbāna sermons = phenomenology of cessation.
Ñāṇavīra = existential structure and self-view.
Ṭhānissaro = skillful fabrication in practice.
Concept and Reality = papañca and conceptual proliferation.
Magic of the Mind = perceptual enchantment.
Law of Dependent Arising = causal mechanics.
MMK = emptiness of all reified structures.
Visuddhimagga = systematic Theravāda path architecture.
Buddhadāsa = immediate dependent origination.
Anālayo = observational mindfulness.
3. Structure Map

Macro-structure: 27 chapters, each dismantling one candidate for intrinsic existence.

Chapter functions:

Conditions — causality cannot be grounded in self-existence.
Motion — mover, movement, and path cannot be isolated.
Sense faculties — perception has no independent perceiver/faculty/object foundation.
Aggregates — personhood cannot be reduced to or separated from aggregates.
Elements — basic constituents lack own-being.
Desire and the desirous one — craving and subject cannot be made self-standing.
Arising, enduring, ceasing — temporal production cannot be found intrinsically.
Agent and action — doer and deed arise dependently.
Prior entity — no self can be established before experience.
Fire and fuel — identity/difference logic collapses around support and supported.
Beginning and end — saṃsāric sequence has no graspable first point.
Suffering — suffering is not self-produced, other-produced, both, or causeless.
Formations — conditioned constructions are empty.
Contact — contact cannot be isolated as a self-existing event.
Essence — direct critique of svabhāva, intrinsic nature.
Bondage and liberation — no inherently bound being is later inherently released.
Action and result — karma works dependently, not through eternal substance.
Self — self cannot be found as identical with or different from aggregates.
Time — past, present, future are mutually dependent designations.
Combination — cause/effect relation cannot be reified.
Becoming and destruction — arising/perishing cannot stand independently.
Tathāgata — even Buddha-language cannot be grasped metaphysically.
Error — ignorance and distortion are empty, yet function.
Four Noble Truths — emptiness safeguards, rather than destroys, dependent arising and path.
Nirvāṇa — nirvāṇa is not an intrinsically existing opposite of saṃsāra.
Twelve links — dependent arising summarized as bondage and cessation.
Views — liberation requires release from metaphysical views.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Emptiness	Universal non-intrinsicness
Dependent arising	Reason things are empty
Svabhāva critique	Dismantles own-being
Causality	Prevents cause/effect reification
Motion/time	Shows process cannot be made substantial
Self/person	Rejects independent subject
Aggregates	No essence in psychophysical components
Contact/perception	Sense-world lacks independent ground
Karma	Preserved as dependent functioning
Nirvāṇa/saṃsāra	Non-duality through emptiness
Views	Final target: clinging to positions
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
Emptiness Is Not a Thing
Why emptiness must not become a hidden substance behind reality.
Dependent Arising as Anti-Metaphysics
How Nāgārjuna turns causality against intrinsic existence.
The Rendered World Has No Core
Mapping MMK onto the Imaginarium model: appearances function, but cannot be found as self-grounded.
The Self Cannot Stand Anywhere
Self is neither identical with nor separate from aggregates, action, perception, or time.
Cause Without Essence
Why causes work only because they are empty.
The Collapse of Motion and Time
Movement, sequence, and duration as dependently designated.
Contact Without Contact-Substance
The sense-world as relational event, not independent meeting of fixed things.
Karma Without a Metaphysical Carrier
Action and result without soul, substance, or nihilism.
Nirvāṇa Is Not Elsewhere
Saṃsāra and nirvāṇa are not two metaphysical realms.
The End of Views
The final de-rendering is not adopting the correct doctrine-object, but releasing grasping at views.
6. Passage-Pack Targets

Use chapter references and short excerpts only.

Priority packs:

Chapter 1: Conditions — causality and dependence.
Chapter 15: Essence — core svabhāva critique.
Chapter 18: Self — self and aggregates.
Chapter 19: Time — past/present/future as dependent.
Chapter 24: Four Noble Truths — emptiness and dependent arising.
Chapter 25: Nirvāṇa — non-reification of nirvāṇa.
Chapter 26: Twelve Links — dependent arising sequence.
Chapter 27: Views — release from metaphysical positions.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Emptiness	Very high	Core source
Dependent arising	Very high	Philosophical backbone
De-reification	Very high	Best source in set
Selfing loop	High	Self is unfindable as essence
Perception as construction	Medium-high	Via faculties/contact/aggregates
Papañca	Medium	Not the main term, but view-making is central
Nibbāna	High	Chapter 25 is essential
Cessation	Medium-high	Not phenomenological like Ñāṇananda
Fabrication	High	Formations are empty
Anti-metaphysics	Very high	Central function
Path of Re-Rendering	Very high	Prevents reifying rendering itself
8. Editorial Review

Nāgārjuna is indispensable because he protects the project from its most tempting mistake: turning “rendering” into a new essence.

The clean Imaginarium formulation:

The world is rendered, but rendering is empty.
The self is constructed, but construction is empty.
Nibbāna is release, but release is not a metaphysical object.

This source should be handled with precision. Do not make it nihilistic. Nāgārjuna is not saying nothing exists or nothing matters. He is saying things function precisely because they are dependently arisen and empty of intrinsic self-ground.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetitive “everything is empty” essays:

Give each essay a distinct target: causality, self, time, contact, action, nirvāṇa, views.
Keep showing how emptiness preserves function rather than negating it.
Use Nāgārjuna as a corrective against both:
eternalism: things truly exist in themselves;
nihilism: nothing exists or practice is meaningless.
Pair with:
Ñāṇananda for lived cessation.
Ñāṇavīra for self-view.
Buddhadāsa for immediate dependent origination.
Anālayo for observational grounding.
Visuddhimagga as contrast: system-building under emptiness scrutiny.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not a meditation manual.
Not easy without commentary.
Not rich in practical breath/body instruction.
Not primarily phenomenological in Ñāṇananda’s style.
English translations are copyright-sensitive.
Easy to misread as nihilism, relativism, or intellectual cleverness.

Patch with:

With Each & Every Breath for embodied practice.
Satipaṭṭhāna for observation.
Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled for cessation phenomenology.
Law of Dependent Arising for early Buddhist causal machinery.
Visuddhimagga for path structure.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source should be:

Buddhaghosa — Visuddhimagga / The Path of Purification

Why: after Nāgārjuna’s anti-reification, the companion volume needs the opposite kind of source: a massive classical path-system architecture. Visuddhimagga gives virtue, concentration, kasina, jhāna, insight knowledges, aggregates, dependent arising, and purification stages — useful both as map and as contrast against Nāgārjuna’s refusal to let any map become ultimate.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Buddhaghosa — Visuddhimagga / The Path of Purification

Access status: free BPS/Access to Insight PDF. The Access to Insight PDF permits redistribution only as unaltered free copies and asks that reproduced passages be clearly attributed; the BPS online edition also states free redistribution is allowed on a free/unrestricted basis. Use short quotes only.

1. Source Identity

Source: Visuddhimagga, “The Path of Purification”
Author: Buddhaghosa
Translator: Bhikkhu Ñāṇamoli
Date: 5th-century Theravāda commentary, composed in Sri Lanka.
Form: massive classical manual of Theravāda doctrine, meditation, and purification.

Core function: the encyclopaedic path-map: virtue, concentration, meditation objects, jhāna, insight, aggregates, dependent arising, knowledge, purification, and liberation.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

The Visuddhimagga is the system architecture source.

Where Ñāṇananda deconstructs the rendered world, Ñāṇavīra cuts self-view, Ṭhānissaro trains fabrication, and Nāgārjuna empties all reifications, Buddhaghosa organizes the whole classical Theravāda path into a technical curriculum.

Its role is not subtle imaginal prose but map, taxonomy, discipline, and sequence.

3. Structure Map

Macro-structure: three great divisions:

Sīla / Virtue
Ethical purification, restraint, livelihood, conduct, and the stabilizing of the practitioner.
Samādhi / Concentration
Meditation objects, kasina practice, breath, divine abidings, immaterial attainments, and jhāna.
Paññā / Wisdom
Aggregates, sense bases, elements, faculties, truths, dependent arising, insight knowledges, path, fruition, and purification.

Functional arc: purify conduct → stabilize attention → analyze experience → see impermanence, suffering, not-self → realize path and release.

4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Virtue	Behavioural purification and restraint
Concentration	Stabilization of attention
Kasina	Image/object-based meditative training
Breath	Mindfulness and collectedness
Jhāna	Absorption architecture
Divine abidings	Loving-kindness, compassion, joy, equanimity
Aggregates	Analysis of self into processes
Sense bases	Perceptual system map
Elements	Material/experiential analysis
Dependent arising	Causal structure of bondage
Insight knowledges	Stages of seeing conditioned phenomena
Purification stages	Path as progressive refinement
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Great Theravāda Machine
Why the Visuddhimagga is the classical architecture of purification.
Virtue as De-Rendering the Social Self
Ethics as the first reconfiguration of identity and action.
The Body Becomes a Training Field
Breath, posture, restraint, and attention as embodied purification.
Kasina and the Disciplined Image
How object, sign, and attention are deliberately stabilized.
Jhāna as Constructed Stillness
Absorption as refined fabrication, not mystical performance.
The Aggregates Replace the Self
How personhood is anatomized into impersonal processes.
The Sense Bases and the Rendered World
Perception as a structured field of contact.
Dependent Arising as Classical Causal Map
Buddhaghosa’s systematic handling of bondage.
Insight Knowledges and the Collapse of Solidity
How phenomena become seen as unstable, unsatisfactory, not-self.
Purification Without Reification
Reading the Visuddhimagga through Nāgārjuna and Ñāṇananda: map-use without map-worship.
6. Passage-Pack Targets

Use short, attributed excerpts only.

Table of contents / threefold structure.
Opening on purification and path.
Virtue section: restraint and conduct.
Kasina sections: object, sign, counterpart sign.
Breath-meditation section.
Jhāna factors and absorption structure.
Aggregates/sense bases/elements analysis.
Dependent arising section.
Insight-knowledge sequence.
Purification/path/fruition sections.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Path architecture	Very high	Best source in set
Meditation taxonomy	Very high	Dozens of objects and methods
Jhāna	Very high	Classical technical map
Fabrication	High	Especially in concentration/image practice
Perception/sign	High	Kasina and nimitta material
Not-self	High	Aggregates and insight
Dependent arising	High	Systematic classical treatment
Papañca	Medium-low	Not the main emphasis
Emptiness	Medium	More Theravāda analytical than Madhyamaka
Nibbāna/liberation	High	Path and fruition architecture
De-rendering	High	Through purification, insight, and non-self analysis
8. Editorial Review

This source is invaluable but dangerous if mishandled.

Its strength is structure: it gives the entire path a technical grammar. Its weakness, for Imaginarium, is that its taxonomies can become too solid. So the best editorial stance is:

Use the map intensely, but do not reify the map.

The Visuddhimagga gives architecture; Ñāṇavīra and Nāgārjuna prevent architecture from becoming metaphysics; Ñāṇananda returns the map to lived cessation.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Do not make every essay about jhāna.
Rotate through virtue, concentration, image, sign, body, aggregates, dependent arising, insight, purification.
Pair with:
Ṭhānissaro for living breath practice.
Ñāṇananda for de-rendering and cessation.
Nāgārjuna for anti-reification.
Anālayo for satipaṭṭhāna.
Buddhadāsa for immediate dependent arising.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Can feel scholastic and taxonomic.
Less vivid than Ñāṇananda.
Less existentially sharp than Ñāṇavīra.
Less anti-reifying than Nāgārjuna.
Some meditation-system assumptions need careful historical/contextual handling.
Not ideal as a first practical manual without guidance.

Patch with:

With Each & Every Breath for direct practice.
Satipaṭṭhāna for observational clarity.
Concept and Reality for papañca.
MMK for emptiness.
Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled for cessation phenomenology.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source:

Buddhadāsa Bhikkhu — Paticcasamuppada: Practical Dependent Origination

Why: after the huge classical system of the Visuddhimagga, Buddhadāsa gives the corrective immediacy: dependent origination as something happening now in lived experience, not merely as a three-life cosmological chart.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Buddhadāsa Bhikkhu — Paticcasamuppada: Practical Dependent Origination

Access status: official free PDF/HTML via Suan Mokkh. Suan Mokkh hosts the book page and downloadable PDF, so this can be used as a free-distribution source, but still prefer summary-heavy use and short quotations only.

1. Source Identity

Source: Paticcasamuppada: Practical Dependent Origination
Author: Buddhadāsa Bhikkhu
Lineage: Thai reformist Theravāda, Suan Mokkh, practical early-Buddhist reinterpretation.
Core function: dependent origination as an immediate, experiential process of suffering and cessation — not merely a three-lifetime cosmological chart.

Buddhadāsa frames paṭiccasamuppāda as “the heart of Buddhism” and the “fullness of the Noble Truths.”

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

Buddhadāsa is the immediacy corrective.

Where Buddhaghosa’s Visuddhimagga gives a vast classical system, Buddhadāsa strips dependent origination back to practical urgency: this is happening now, in contact, feeling, craving, clinging, becoming, and suffering.

Compared with the others:

Ñāṇananda gives phenomenological depth and sign/world deconstruction.
Ñāṇavīra gives existential severity.
Ṭhānissaro gives breath-fabrication training.
Concept and Reality gives papañca.
Magic of the Mind gives perceptual illusion.
Law of Dependent Arising gives Ñāṇananda’s causal architecture.
Nāgārjuna gives emptiness of intrinsic existence.
Visuddhimagga gives classical taxonomy.
Anālayo gives satipaṭṭhāna observation.
3. Structure Map

Functional movement:

Why dependent origination matters
It is presented as the central practical law of Buddhism: the beginning and ending of suffering.
Critique of misunderstanding
Buddhadāsa challenges readings that move the decisive causes of suffering into inaccessible past-life explanations.
Immediate-cycle interpretation
The twelve links are read as operating in lived experience, sometimes with great speed.
Contact as the battlefield
Sense contact becomes the decisive point where ignorance or wisdom determines the chain.
Feeling to craving
Vedanā becomes the hinge: feeling either conditions craving or is known with mindfulness.
Clinging, becoming, birth
Identity is repeatedly born through appropriation: “I,” “me,” “mine,” role, mood, story.
Cessation in this life
If the chain is seen at contact/feeling, suffering can cease here and now.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Practical dependent origination	Makes paṭiccasamuppāda immediate
Contact	Decisive sense-event
Feeling	Hinge between wisdom and craving
Craving	Thirst that renews suffering
Clinging	Appropriation of experience as mine
Becoming	Formation of identity-world
Birth	Momentary birth of ego-position
No-self	No transmigrating self required
Cessation	Practical interruption of suffering
Critique of three-life literalism	Prevents deferring liberation into abstraction
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
Dependent Origination Is Happening Now
Buddhadāsa’s central correction: this is not distant metaphysics but present process.
The Flash-Birth of Self
How “birth” can be read as the arising of an ego-position.
Contact: Where the World Catches Fire
The sense-event as the ignition point of suffering.
Feeling as the Fork in Reality
Vedanā either becomes craving or becomes known.
Craving as Re-Rendering
Thirst turns contact into a world-for-me.
Clinging and the Manufacture of Mine
Appropriation as the hardening of experience into identity.
Becoming as Role-World Formation
How moods, roles, and narratives become temporary worlds.
No Soul Travels Through the Links
The twelve links without metaphysical self-carrier.
Cessation Is Practical, Not Mythic
The ending of suffering as an interruption of conditions.
Buddhadāsa and the Imaginarium Loop
Mapping dependent origination onto perception → feeling → craving → selfing → action → perception.
6. Passage-Pack Targets

Use short extracts only.

Opening claim that paṭiccasamuppāda is the heart/fullness of the Noble Truths.
Critique of three-lifetime interpretation.
Contact and feeling sections.
Craving/clinging/becoming/birth sections.
No-self implications.
Cessation sequence.
Practical advice around mindfulness/wisdom at sense contact.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Immediate dependent arising	Very high	Core contribution
Selfing loop	Very high	Birth of “I” as process
Contact	Very high	Main intervention point
Feeling-tone	Very high	Crucial hinge
Craving	Very high	Re-rendering force
Perception as construction	Medium-high	Through sense contact
Papañca	Medium	Not the central vocabulary
Emptiness/no-self	High	No self-carrier in the chain
Nibbāna/cessation	High	Practical cessation
Meditation method	Medium	More doctrinal-practical than manual
De-rendering	Very high	Stopping the live chain
8. Editorial Review

This source is crucial because it makes dependent origination operational.

For Path of Re-Rendering, Buddhadāsa gives the most direct “in the moment” loop:

contact → feeling → craving → clinging → becoming → birth of self-world → suffering.

The editorial danger is flattening him into “rebirth denial” discourse. Better framing: his project is to make dependent origination usable as a direct analysis of suffering and cessation here and now, while avoiding metaphysical self-smuggling.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Do not make every essay only about rejecting three-life interpretation.
Focus on contact, feeling, ego-birth, becoming, no-self, cessation, and practical interruption.
Pair with:
Ñāṇananda’s Law of Dependent Arising for deeper causal architecture.
Ñāṇavīra for existential structure.
Ṭhānissaro for practice/fabrication.
Anālayo for mindfulness at contact/feeling.
Nāgārjuna for anti-essentialism.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Less systematic than Visuddhimagga.
Less phenomenologically rich than Ñāṇananda.
Less philosophically rigorous than Nāgārjuna.
Not primarily a meditation manual.
Can be controversial if presented as simply “the correct” reading.

Patch with:

Ñāṇananda for subtle phenomenology.
Ñāṇavīra for precision.
Anālayo for comparative textual grounding.
Ṭhānissaro for embodied training.
Visuddhimagga for classical contrast.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source:

Bhikkhu Anālayo — Satipaṭṭhāna: The Direct Path to Realization

Why: after Buddhadāsa’s immediacy, Anālayo gives the observational method: body, feeling, mind, dhammas — the direct seeing of the processes by which the self-world forms and can be released.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Bhikkhu Anālayo — Satipaṭṭhāna: The Direct Path to Realization

Access status: official publication is copyrighted by Windhorse/BPS lineage, but Bhikkhu Anālayo’s publications page links a downloadable copy and lists Asian editions; free PDFs are also hosted by University of Hamburg and Abhayagiri. Treat as free-access / copyright-cautious: summary-heavy, short quotes only.

1. Source Identity

Source: Satipaṭṭhāna: The Direct Path to Realization
Author: Bhikkhu Anālayo
Form: scholarly-practical commentary on the Satipaṭṭhāna Sutta.
Core function: the observational method-source: body, feeling, mind, and dhammas as the four fields where the arising and fading of self-world can be directly known.

Anālayo is a scholar-monk specializing in early Buddhism and meditation; Barre Center for Buddhist Studies describes his main research area as early Buddhism, especially meditation.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

Anālayo is the direct observation and comparative scholarship node.

Where Ñāṇananda reveals the rendered world through signs, consciousness, contact, and cessation, Anālayo gives the observational grid: watch body, feeling, mind, and dhammas until the constructed nature of experience becomes clear.

Compared with the others:

Ñāṇananda’s Nibbāna sermons = cessation/de-rendering.
Ñāṇavīra = structural self-view critique.
Ṭhānissaro = breath/fabrication training.
Concept and Reality = papañca and language.
Magic of the Mind = perceptual enchantment.
Law of Dependent Arising = causal machinery.
Nāgārjuna = emptiness and anti-reification.
Visuddhimagga = classical system architecture.
Buddhadāsa = immediate dependent origination.
Anālayo = methodical observation of the process.
3. Structure Map

Functional movement:

Direct path frame
Satipaṭṭhāna as a direct path, not vague mindfulness.
Refrain / method grammar
Internal/external observation, arising/passing, bare knowing, non-clinging.
Body contemplation
Breath, postures, activities, anatomy, elements, corpse contemplations.
Feeling contemplation
Pleasant, painful, neutral feeling as the hinge where craving can form.
Mind contemplation
Knowing mind-states directly: lustful/free, contracted/distracted, developed/undeveloped.
Dhammas contemplation
Hindrances, aggregates, sense bases, awakening factors, Four Noble Truths.
Comparative early Buddhist context
Uses textual comparison to clarify interpretation and prevent flattening.
Liberation function
Observation weakens identification and clinging by seeing processes as processes.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Mindfulness	Remembering and sustaining the observational frame
Body	Embodied field of direct knowing
Feeling	Affective hinge before craving
Mind	State-recognition without identification
Dhammas	Structural categories of bondage/release
Arising and passing	Process-view replacing thing-view
Non-clinging	Methodological endpoint of observation
Internal/external	De-centers ownership of experience
Bare knowing	Seeing without narrative inflation
Sense bases	Perceptual contact system
Awakening factors	Skillful qualities that mature observation
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
Mindfulness Is Not Mood Management
Satipaṭṭhāna as a rigorous mode of knowing, not generic calm.
The Refrain as De-Rendering Grammar
Arising, passing, internal, external, knowing, and non-clinging.
The Body Without Biography
Body contemplation as de-personalizing the embodied self-image.
Feeling Before Story
Vedanā as the exact place where the world starts becoming “for me.”
Mind as Weather, Not Owner
Mind-states known as conditions, not identities.
Dhammas as Diagnostic Interfaces
Hindrances, aggregates, sense bases, and awakening factors as operational maps.
The Sense Bases and the Contact Machine
Perception as structured contact, not passive reception.
Aggregates Without Personhood
Satipaṭṭhāna as the direct dismantling of self-imputation.
Non-Clinging as the Direct Path
Liberation through knowing without taking up.
Anālayo and the Path of Re-Rendering
How methodical observation transforms the rendered self-world.
6. Passage-Pack Targets

Use short extracts only.

Opening definition of satipaṭṭhāna as direct path.
Refrain formula: arising/passing, internal/external, non-clinging.
Body section: breath and postures.
Feeling section: pleasant, painful, neutral.
Mind section: knowing mind-states as mind-states.
Dhammas: hindrances.
Dhammas: aggregates and sense bases.
Dhammas: awakening factors and Four Noble Truths.
Comparative notes where they clarify practice meaning.
Closing liberation/direct-realization material.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Direct observation	Very high	Core source
Feeling-tone	Very high	Vedanā contemplation is crucial
Body as rendered field	High	Breath, posture, anatomy, elements
Mind-state de-identification	Very high	Mind known without ownership
Perception/contact	High	Sense bases in dhammas section
Selfing loop	High	Identification weakens through observation
Dependent arising	Medium-high	Seen operationally through contact/feeling/clinging
Papañca	Medium	Less central than Ñāṇananda
Emptiness/not-self	High	Process-view and non-clinging
Nibbāna/liberation	High	Direct path toward realization
Practical method	Very high	Best source with Ṭhānissaro
8. Editorial Review

This source is the observational discipline of the Buddhist companion volume.

The key Imaginarium function:

Anālayo gives the method for catching the rendering process live.

Ñāṇananda explains the signs and worlding; Ñāṇavīra cuts self-view; Buddhadāsa shows the immediate chain; Anālayo shows how to look: body as body, feeling as feeling, mind as mind, dhammas as dhammas.

Do not turn satipaṭṭhāna into vague “be present” advice. Its power is its precision: it separates process from ownership.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Do not make every essay “observe without clinging.”
Rotate between body, feeling, mind, dhammas, internal/external, arising/passing, sense bases, hindrances, awakening factors.
Pair with:
Buddhadāsa for immediate dependent origination.
Ṭhānissaro for breath and fabrication.
Ñāṇananda for signs and cessation.
Ñāṇavīra for self-view.
Nāgārjuna for emptiness.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Less focused on papañca than Concept and Reality.
Less metaphysically sharp than Nāgārjuna.
Less existentially severe than Ñāṇavīra.
Less encyclopaedic than Visuddhimagga.
More observational than poetic or imaginal.

Patch with:

Concept and Reality for language/proliferation.
The Magic of the Mind for perceptual enchantment.
Law of Dependent Arising for causal mechanics.
With Each & Every Breath for breath-fabrication.
MMK for anti-reification.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source should move beyond the initial 10:

Dhammapada — early Buddhist verse anthology

Why: after technical and commentarial sources, the companion volume needs a compact canonical poetic source: mind, action, heedfulness, craving, purity, self-mastery, and liberation in memorable early Buddhist verse.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Dhammapada — Early Buddhist Verse Anthology

Access status: freely available. Access to Insight hosts the Dhammapada index under Creative Commons Attribution 4.0, while individual linked translations may have separate restrictions; SuttaCentral also hosts Bhikkhu Sujato’s free edition. Use short verse excerpts only.

1. Source Identity

Source: Dhammapada, “Sayings/Verses of Dhamma”
Canonical location: Khuddaka Nikāya of the Pāli Canon.
Form: 423 verses in 26 chapters; Access to Insight calls it one of the best-known texts in the Pāli Tipiṭaka.


Core function: poetic condensation of early Buddhist training: mind, heedfulness, craving, purity, self-mastery, wisdom, and liberation.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

The Dhammapada is the poetic ethical-phenomenological primer.

Where Ñāṇananda gives deep causal/phenomenological de-rendering, Ñāṇavīra gives existential severity, Nāgārjuna gives emptiness dialectic, and Anālayo gives observational method, the Dhammapada gives the path in memorable verse: the mind leads, craving binds, heedfulness protects, wisdom cuts, and liberation cools.

It is less technical than the previous sources, but ideal as the companion volume’s canonical poetic spine.

3. Structure Map

Macro-structure: 26 thematic chapters.

Key chapter functions:

Pairs — action and consequence, mind as forerunner.
Heedfulness — vigilance as path-protection.
Mind — training the restless mind.
Flowers — gathering, fragrance, virtue, death.
Fools — delusion and bad companionship.
Wise — counsel, discipline, good friendship.
Arahants — liberated qualities.
Thousands — quality over quantity in practice.
Evil — karmic danger of unskillful action.
Violence — harmlessness and restraint.
Old Age — decay, urgency, mortality.
Self — self-training and responsibility.
World — seeing through worldly enchantment.
Buddha — awakened exemplar.
Happiness — non-hostility and peace.
Affection — attachment as sorrow.
Anger — restraint and patience.
Impurity — inner stain and purification.
Just — true justice beyond appearance.
Path — Eightfold Path, impermanence, not-self.
Miscellaneous — compressed practical counsel.
Hell — consequences of harmful action.
Elephant — endurance and restraint.
Craving — the clearest bondage chapter.
Monk — discipline and inwardness.
Brahmin — the liberated one redefined.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Mind	Experience shaped by mental intention
Heedfulness	Continuous guarding of the path
Craving	Binding force of repeated becoming
Self-training	No external rescuer; discipline is personal
Not-self	Explicit in the Path chapter
Impermanence	Seeing decay and instability
Ethical causality	Action conditions future experience
Speech/restraint	Social self purified through conduct
World	Sensory-social enchantment to be seen through
Liberation	Arahant/Brahmin chapters redefine nobility as release
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
Mind as Forerunner
The Dhammapada’s opening thesis: experience follows trained or untrained mind.
Heedfulness as the First Technology of Liberation
Why vigilance matters before subtle metaphysics.
The Restless Mind and the Rendered World
Mind-training as stabilizing the projector.
Craving: The Creeper of Self-World
Chapter 24 as the anthology’s strongest dependent-arising bridge.
Old Age, Death, and Urgency
Mortality as anti-delusion, not morbidity.
The Ethics of De-Rendering
Virtue as reducing the social/affective fuel of selfing.
The World as Enchantment
The World chapter as compact early Buddhist illusion-analysis.
Not-Self in Verse
How the Path chapter condenses impermanence, suffering, and not-self.
The Arahant and the Brahmin Rewritten
Liberation as a new definition of nobility.
Poetry After Doctrine
Why verse can carry Dhamma where technical analysis cannot.
6. Passage-Pack Targets
Opening verses on mind as forerunner.
Heedfulness chapter.
Mind chapter.
World chapter.
Old Age chapter.
Path chapter: impermanence, suffering, not-self.
Craving chapter.
Arahant chapter.
Brahmin chapter.
Verses on speech, restraint, and harmlessness.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Mind as renderer	High	Strong opening frame
Craving	Very high	Chapter 24 is essential
Self-training	Very high	Practical ethical agency
Not-self	Medium-high	Explicit but compact
Dependent arising	Medium	Implied through action/craving
Papañca	Low-medium	Not technical vocabulary
Perception/world enchantment	Medium-high	World and Flowers chapters
Nibbāna/liberation	High	Arahant/Brahmin/path verses
Practice accessibility	Very high	Best entry source
Poetic force	Very high	Canonical memorable language
8. Editorial Review

The Dhammapada gives the companion volume its canonical poetic charge.

Its value is not technical exhaustiveness. Its value is compression: mind, craving, death, heedfulness, restraint, and liberation are made unforgettable.

For Path of Re-Rendering, the key reading is:

The rendered world is retrained first through heedfulness, ethical restraint, and mind-discipline; only then can deeper deconstruction become stable.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Do not make every essay moralistic.
Treat ethics as phenomenology: action shapes perception.
Use verse as compression, not proof-text decoration.
Pair with:
Ñāṇananda for world/sign deconstruction.
Ñāṇavīra for self-view.
Buddhadāsa for craving and immediate arising.
Anālayo for mindfulness method.
Nāgārjuna for emptiness beyond poetic condensation.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not systematic dependent arising.
Not detailed meditation instruction.
Not a philosophical emptiness treatise.
Not focused on papañca.
Verse can be over-simplified into moral slogans.

Patch with:

Law of Dependent Arising for mechanism.
Satipaṭṭhāna for observation.
Concept and Reality for papañca.
MMK for emptiness.
With Each & Every Breath for practice.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source:

Udāna — Inspired Utterances

Why: after the Dhammapada’s poetic ethical force, the Udāna gives compact canonical scenes around awakening, Nibbāna, non-clinging, silence, and the famous “unborn/unmade” liberation language — excellent for the Imaginarium’s Nibbāna and de-rendering layer.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Udāna — Inspired Utterances

Access status: strong open-access options. SuttaCentral hosts Bhikkhu Sujato’s Udāna translation under CC0/public-domain dedication, while Access to Insight hosts Thanissaro Bhikkhu selections under CC BY-NC 4.0 for individual pages. Use SuttaCentral/Sujato for safest open quotation; still prefer short excerpts.

1. Source Identity

Source: Udāna, “Inspired Utterances”
Canonical location: Khuddaka Nikāya, Pāli Canon.
Form: 80 short prose-framed discourses, divided into 8 chapters of 10 texts; each usually culminates in an inspired utterance.


Core function: compact canonical scenes of insight: awakening, silence, non-clinging, renunciation, Nibbāna, and the famous “unborn/unmade” liberation language.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

The Udāna is the canonical flash-point source.

Where the Dhammapada gives memorable ethical verse, the Udāna gives charged scenes: a situation, a seeing, then a distilled utterance. It is less systematic than Ñāṇananda, Ñāṇavīra, Nāgārjuna, or Anālayo, but it is extremely valuable for the Imaginarium because it shows Dhamma as a moment of world-disclosure.

Compared with the prior sources:

Ñāṇananda explains de-rendering conceptually and phenomenologically.
Ñāṇavīra cuts self-view structurally.
Ṭhānissaro trains fabrication through breath.
Nāgārjuna empties all reified positions.
Anālayo gives the observational grid.
Udāna gives the canonical shock-image: the moment where the constructed world is seen through.
3. Structure Map

Eight-chapter architecture:

Bodhi Vagga / Awakening
Early awakening scenes; dependent arising, liberation, and the first post-awakening insight-field.
Mucalinda Vagga
Protection, solitude, restraint, and the peaceful one amid conditions.
Nanda Vagga
Desire, discipline, karmic action, and transformation of attachment.
Meghiya Vagga
Mind-development, solitude, impatience, and conditions for maturation.
Soṇa Vagga
Practice balance, lay devotion, and the refinement of effort.
Jaccandha Vagga / Blind from Birth
Partial views, the blind-men-and-elephant structure, sectarian grasping, and the limits of perspective.
Cūḷa Vagga
Compact teachings on discipline, conduct, and spiritual distinction.
Pāṭaligāmiya Vagga
Nibbāna, the unmade/unborn, final release, and the strongest de-rendering passages.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Inspired utterance	Dhamma as compressed seeing
Awakening scenes	Insight embodied in narrative moments
Dependent arising	Present especially in the Awakening chapter
Solitude	Conditions for mind-maturation
Desire	Attachment as world-binding
Partial views	Blind-men-and-elephant critique of viewpoint
Nibbāna	Unborn, unbecome, unmade language
Silence	Non-proliferation and non-position
Restraint	Ethical cooling of the self-world
Cessation	Liberation as the non-arising of constructed bondage
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Flash of Dhamma
Why the Udāna matters: not system, but crystallized seeing.
Awakening After the World Has Gone Quiet
The Bodhi chapter as post-awakening phenomenology.
Dependent Arising in a Single Scene
How the opening chapter compresses bondage and release.
The Peaceful One Under the Storm
Mucalinda as symbolic image of inner release amid conditions.
Desire as Captivation
Nanda and the transformation of sensual enchantment.
The Mind That Ripens Slowly
Meghiya, impatience, and the conditions needed for insight.
The Blind Men and the Elephant
Viewpoint as partial contact mistaken for whole reality.
The Unborn and the Unmade
Nibbāna language without metaphysical reification.
Inspired Speech After Papañca
Udāna as speech that does not proliferate.
The Scene as De-Rendering Device
How narrative, image, and utterance reveal the constructed self-world.
6. Passage-Pack Targets
Ud 1.1–1.3 — awakening and dependent arising sequence.
Mucalinda episode — peace amid conditions.
Nanda-related passages — desire and conversion of attention.
Meghiya episode — premature solitude and conditions for mind-release.
Soṇa material — balanced effort.
Blind-men-and-elephant passage — partial view and sectarian fixation.
Ud 8.1–8.4 Nibbāna passages — unborn/unmade/cooling language.
Closing utterances where silence, release, and non-clinging dominate.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Nibbāna	Very high	Especially final chapter
Cessation	High	Strong in release passages
Dependent arising	Medium-high	Compact but powerful
Viewpoint critique	Very high	Blind-men-and-elephant
Papañca	Medium-high	Implied through non-proliferative utterance
Perception as partial contact	High	Strong in view/parables
Selfing loop	Medium-high	Through desire, views, grasping
Meditation phenomenology	Medium	More scene-based than manual
Poetic force	Very high	Its main strength
De-rendering	High	Scene + utterance breaks ordinary framing
8. Editorial Review

The Udāna should be used as the scene-poetry layer of the Buddhist companion volume.

It does something the technical sources do not: it shows Dhamma arriving as a flash. A situation becomes transparent; the Buddha speaks; the utterance cuts through the scene.

For Path of Re-Rendering, this is gold: the rendered world is not only analyzed by doctrine, but punctured by image, silence, parable, and utterance.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Do not make every essay about the “unborn.”
Rotate between awakening, dependent arising, solitude, desire, ripening, balanced effort, viewpoint critique, Nibbāna, and inspired speech.
Use the prose frame as much as the verse: the scene is part of the teaching.
Pair with:
Ñāṇananda for Nibbāna/de-rendering.
Ñāṇavīra for viewpoint/self-view severity.
Buddhadāsa for immediate dependent arising.
Nāgārjuna for anti-reification of “unborn.”
Anālayo for observational method.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not systematic.
Not a full meditation manual.
Not a complete dependent-arising commentary.
Not a Madhyamaka text.
Its Nibbāna language can be reified if handled badly.

Patch with:

Nibbāna: The Mind Stilled for cessation analysis.
Law of Dependent Arising for causal mechanics.
Notes on Dhamma for self-view precision.
MMK for emptiness guardrails.
Satipaṭṭhāna for observational method.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source:

Itivuttaka — “This Was Said”

Why: it pairs naturally with the Udāna: another compact Khuddaka Nikāya source, but more doctrinally explicit. It gives short teachings on craving, becoming, elements, Nibbāna, liberation, training, and the danger of self-world attachment.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Itivuttaka — “This Was Said”

Access status: strong open-access options. SuttaCentral hosts Bhikkhu Sujato’s Itivuttaka translation as 112 short discourses in mixed prose and verse; Access to Insight also describes the text as 112 short suttas on focused Dhamma topics.

1. Source Identity

Source: Itivuttaka, “This Was Said” / “So It Was Said”
Canonical location: Khuddaka Nikāya.
Form: 112 compact teachings, usually prose plus verse, arranged in numbered sets from ones to fours.


Core function: short doctrinal flashes on greed, hatred, delusion, craving, giving, virtue, becoming, elements, Nibbāna, and liberation.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

The Itivuttaka is the compact doctrinal-flash source.

Where the Udāna gives charged awakening scenes, the Itivuttaka gives precise teaching-units: one theme, one cut, one memorable verse. It is less imagistic than the Udāna, less technical than Ñāṇananda or Nāgārjuna, but excellent for building short passage-packs around craving, selfing, purification, and cessation.

3. Structure Map

Macro-structure: four numbered books:

Book of Ones — single defilements or qualities: greed, hate, delusion, anger, conceit, and “the All.”
Book of Twos — paired structures: virtue/wrong conduct, calm/insight, shame/fear of wrongdoing, giving.
Book of Threes — triadic Dhamma patterns: three fires, three feelings, three cravings, three trainings.
Book of Fours — fuller doctrinal frames: elements, striving, Nibbāna-related contrasts, noble qualities.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Greed/hatred/delusion	Root affective distortions
Conceit	“I am” as subtle selfing
Craving	Engine of becoming
Feeling	Hinge before craving
Giving	De-appropriation practice
Virtue	Ethical deconditioning
Elements	De-personalizing the body-world
Calm and insight	Training balance
Nibbāna	Cooling, release, unbinding
Liberation	Freedom through abandoning causes
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
One Thing to Abandon
The Book of Ones as surgical Dhamma: greed, hate, delusion, conceit.
The All and the End of Ownership
How “the All” frames experience without needing a metaphysical self.
Feeling Before the Self Is Born
Vedanā as the point where suffering can either ignite or fade.
Craving as the Architect of Becoming
How thirst gives continuity to the self-world.
Conceit: The Last Signature of Self
“I am” as subtler than belief.
Giving as Anti-Clinging Technology
Dāna as practical de-rendering of ownership.
Elements Without Personhood
Body and world seen as impersonal processes.
Calm and Insight as Two Modes of Re-Rendering
Stillness and seeing as complementary transformations.
Nibbāna in Miniature
Compact liberation language without metaphysical inflation.
The Short Sutta as Precision Instrument
Why brief teachings can cut more cleanly than systems.
6. Passage-Pack Targets
Book of Ones: greed, hatred, delusion, conceit.
“The All” passages.
Giving passages.
Feeling-related passages.
Craving/becoming passages.
Elements passages.
Calm-and-insight passages.
Nibbāna/release passages.
Teachings on arahants/liberated ones.
Closing Book of Fours doctrinal summaries.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Craving	High	Repeated compact treatment
Selfing loop	High	Conceit, craving, becoming
Feeling-tone	Medium-high	Strong bridge to dependent arising
Dependent arising	Medium	Often implicit rather than systematic
Not-self	Medium-high	Through elements, All, abandoning conceit
Papañca	Low-medium	Not central vocabulary
Nibbāna	High	Short, concentrated release language
Ethical deconditioning	Very high	Giving, virtue, restraint
Meditation phenomenology	Medium	Calm/insight rather than detailed method
De-rendering	High	Through abandoning, cooling, non-ownership
8. Editorial Review

The Itivuttaka is useful because it gives small, dense Dhamma modules.

For the Imaginarium, it functions like a library of short “rendering interrupts”: greed, conceit, craving, feeling, ownership, and becoming are isolated one by one. It is not a grand theory, but it repeatedly shows the same practical law:

abandon the condition, and the self-world loses fuel.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Do not make every essay “give up craving.”
Rotate through greed, conceit, giving, feeling, elements, calm/insight, Nibbāna.
Use the prose-plus-verse format: each teaching has a doctrinal statement and a poetic condensation.
Pair with Ñāṇananda for dependent-arising depth, Buddhadāsa for immediacy, Anālayo for observation, and Nāgārjuna for anti-reification.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not systematic.
Not a full meditation manual.
Not a detailed emptiness treatise.
Not focused on papañca.
Easy to flatten into moral advice if not read phenomenologically.

Patch with:

Concept and Reality for papañca.
Law of Dependent Arising for mechanism.
Satipaṭṭhāna for observation.
MMK for emptiness.
With Each & Every Breath for practical training.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source:

Sutta Nipāta

Why: it gives early, austere, poetic Dhamma on craving, solitude, non-clinging, sagehood, views, silence, and the release of the one who no longer builds a world around self.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Sutta Nipāta — Early Buddhist Poetic Discourses

Access status: strong open-access options. SuttaCentral hosts Bhikkhu Sujato’s translation under CC0/public-domain dedication; Access to Insight hosts an indexed selection of translations; SuttaCentral also has a CC0 Laurence Khantipalo Mills edition.

1. Source Identity

Source: Sutta Nipāta, “The Sutta Collection”
Canonical location: Khuddaka Nikāya.
Form: early Buddhist verse/prose discourses in five chapters: Uragavagga, Cūḷavagga, Mahāvagga, Aṭṭhakavagga, and Pārāyanavagga.


Core function: austere early Dhamma on craving, solitude, sagehood, non-clinging, views, silence, and release.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

The Sutta Nipāta is the early austerity and view-release source.

Where Ñāṇananda gives phenomenological de-rendering, Ñāṇavīra gives existential severity, and Nāgārjuna gives formal emptiness dialectic, the Sutta Nipāta gives the raw poetic root: abandon views, loosen craving, stop building identity, live as one who does not cling.

It especially prepares the bridge from early Buddhism to Madhyamaka: the Aṭṭhakavagga and Pārāyanavagga strongly emphasize non-attachment to views and the “far shore” beyond fixation.

3. Structure Map

Five-chapter architecture:

Uragavagga / Snake Chapter
Shedding defilements like old skin; renunciation, restraint, and early ascetic imagery.
Cūḷavagga / Lesser Chapter
Ethical training, good conduct, refuge, and practical foundations.
Mahāvagga / Great Chapter
Larger narrative and doctrinal discourses: awakening, noble qualities, struggle, and instruction.
Aṭṭhakavagga / Octet Chapter
Radical non-clinging to views, sensual desire, identity, purity-claims, and doctrinal positions.
Pārāyanavagga / Way to the Far Shore
Question-and-answer teachings on wisdom, liberation, craving, ageing, death, and crossing beyond.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Craving	Binding force of sensuality and becoming
Views	Central target, especially Aṭṭhakavagga
Sagehood	The released person as unattached, silent, restrained
Solitude	Withdrawal from social/self-world entanglement
Non-clinging	Core liberation gesture
Far shore	Poetic image of crossing beyond bondage
Sense restraint	Cooling the world at the doors of contact
Conceit	“I am” as subtle identity-position
Silence	Speech purified of proliferation
Nibbāna	Implied through peace, crossing, cooling, non-attachment
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Snake Sheds the World
Renunciation as shedding the constructed skin of self.
The Sage Without a Position
The early Buddhist ideal of one who does not cling to doctrines, identities, or social roles.
Craving as the Builder of Place
Desire creates the world one must then inhabit.
Against the Trap of Views
Aṭṭhakavagga as the canonical root of anti-dogmatic Dhamma.
Purity Without Purity-Identity
How the text cuts even spiritual self-images.
The Far Shore as De-Rendering Image
Pārāyanavagga and the crossing beyond constructed bondage.
Silence After Papañca
Speech that no longer multiplies self-world.
The Body, Desire, and the Cave
Embodiment as both trap and field of seeing.
Sutta Nipāta and Nāgārjuna
Early non-clinging to views as proto-Madhyamaka energy.
The Austere Poetics of Liberation
Why this text matters for Imaginarium: few doctrines, sharp images, direct cutting.
6. Passage-Pack Targets
Sn 1.1 Uraga Sutta — shedding defilements.
Kāma Sutta / sensual desire material — craving as captivity.
Guhatthaka / Cave imagery — body, desire, and self-enclosure.
Aṭṭhakavagga view-critiques — purity, doctrines, quarrels.
Paramaṭṭhaka Sutta — clinging to “supreme” views; CC0 Sujato page available.
Pārāyanavagga questions — crossing, wisdom, old age, death.
Mogharāja material — seeing the world as empty.
Verses on the muni/sage — silence, solitude, non-ownership.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
View-release	Very high	Core source
Craving	Very high	Strong poetic treatment
Papañca	High	Through quarrels, views, speech, proliferation
Selfing loop	High	Identity as position, claim, purity-view
Emptiness	Medium-high	Especially “world as empty” material
Nibbāna/liberation	High	Far shore, peace, non-clinging
Dependent arising	Medium	Less systematic, more poetic
Perception	Medium-high	Seeing without fixation
Meditation phenomenology	Medium	Not a manual, but rich in renunciant phenomenology
De-rendering	Very high	Through viewlessness, desirelessness, silence
8. Editorial Review

The Sutta Nipāta should function as the austere poetic root of the Buddhist companion volume.

Its genius is not system. Its genius is cutting away the need for system-as-identity. It repeatedly asks: what remains when one no longer builds a self out of desire, doctrine, purity, speech, social standing, or metaphysical position?

For Path of Re-Rendering, the clean formulation is:

The world is not only rendered by perception; it is defended by views. Release requires the collapse of the position from which “my world” is argued, purified, and protected.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Do not reduce the text to “views are bad.”
Rotate between desire, solitude, sagehood, speech, purity, far shore, emptiness, and quarrel.
Pair with:
Ñāṇavīra for self-view severity.
Ñāṇananda for papañca and signs.
Nāgārjuna for emptiness dialectic.
Buddhadāsa for immediate craving/selfing.
Anālayo for observational grounding.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not systematic dependent arising.
Not a practical breath manual.
Not a scholastic path map.
Not a full philosophical emptiness treatise.
Its anti-view language can be misread as anti-thinking or vague quietism.

Patch with:

Law of Dependent Arising for mechanism.
With Each & Every Breath for embodied practice.
Visuddhimagga for architecture.
MMK for formal emptiness.
Concept and Reality for papañca.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source:

Majjhima Nikāya — selected suttas: Madhupiṇḍika, Mahātaṇhāsaṅkhaya, Cūḷasuññata, Mahāsuññata, Satipaṭṭhāna, Ānāpānasati

Why: after the Sutta Nipāta, the project needs a selected-discourse canonical engine: concrete suttas on papañca, consciousness, craving, voidness, mindfulness, breath, and the dismantling of self-world.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Majjhima Nikāya — Selected Discourses on Papañca, Consciousness, Voidness, and Breath

Access status: strong open-access options. SuttaCentral hosts early Buddhist texts and translations, including Bhikkhu Sujato’s MN translations; Access to Insight hosts many MN translations and describes the Majjhima Nikāya as 152 middle-length discourses covering major aspects of the teaching.

1. Source Identity

Source: Majjhima Nikāya, selected suttas
Canonical location: Sutta Piṭaka, Pāli Canon
Core selection: MN 18, MN 38, MN 121, MN 122, MN 118, plus supporting suttas.
Core function: the canonical discourse-engine for the whole project: papañca, consciousness, craving, emptiness, seclusion, mindfulness, breath, and the dismantling of self-world.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

This selection is the canonical engine-room behind the companion volume.

Ñāṇananda, Ñāṇavīra, Buddhadāsa, Anālayo, and Ṭhānissaro all draw power from this layer. The commentarial and modern sources explain, sharpen, or operationalize what these suttas already contain:

MN 18 Madhupiṇḍika gives papañca and conflict.
MN 38 Mahātaṇhāsaṅkhaya gives consciousness as dependently arisen, not a transmigrating essence.
MN 121 Cūḷasuññata gives graduated emptiness practice.
MN 122 Mahāsuññata gives seclusion and great emptiness.
MN 118 Ānāpānasati gives breath practice as a complete path sequence.
3. Structure Map
Sutta	Function
MN 18 Madhupiṇḍika	Contact → perception → thinking → papañca; conflict begins in proliferation.
MN 38 Mahātaṇhāsaṅkhaya	Refutes consciousness as a self-identical wanderer; shows consciousness as conditioned.
MN 121 Cūḷasuññata	Emptiness as progressive perception and dwelling.
MN 122 Mahāsuññata	Emptiness, seclusion, and the danger of social/worldly entanglement.
MN 118 Ānāpānasati	Sixteen-step breath practice linked to mindfulness and awakening factors.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Papañca	How perception becomes conflict/world-story
Contact	Ignition-point of the rendered world
Consciousness	Dependently arisen knowing, not self-substance
Craving	Fuel of becoming and identity
Voidness	Deconstruction of occupancy, ownership, and world-density
Seclusion	Removing conditions that feed proliferation
Breath	Trainable bodily-mind interface
Mindfulness	Direct knowing of body, feeling, mind, dhammas
Awakening factors	Maturation of observation into release
Non-clinging	Final practical direction of the whole selection
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Honeyball of the World
MN 18 as the canonical theory of contact becoming papañca.
Consciousness Is Not a Traveller
MN 38 against the hidden soul-model of mind.
The Feedback Loop of Name-and-Form
How consciousness and experience co-establish each other.
Voidness as Receding Occupancy
MN 121 as progressive de-occupation of the rendered field.
Great Emptiness and the Social Self
MN 122 on seclusion, company, and the danger of re-entering role-worlds too quickly.
Breath as the Path in Miniature
MN 118 as full training arc: body, feeling, mind, dhammas.
From Contact to Conflict
How perception becomes argument, identity, and world-defense.
From Breath to Awakening Factors
How bodily mindfulness matures into investigation, energy, joy, calm, concentration, and equanimity.
Canonical Roots of Ñāṇananda
How these suttas feed Concept and Reality, Magic of the Mind, and Mind Stilled.
The Majjhima Engine of De-Rendering
The selected MN corpus as the direct canonical base for Imaginarium.
6. Passage-Pack Targets
MN 18 — contact, perception, thinking, papañca sequence.
MN 38 — Sāti’s wrong view of consciousness and the Buddha’s correction.
MN 38 — consciousness/name-and-form/dependent arising passages.
MN 121 — graduated emptiness perception.
MN 122 — seclusion and great emptiness.
MN 118 — sixteen steps of breath mindfulness.

MN 118 — awakening factors supported by seclusion, dispassion, cessation, relinquishment.

Cross-pack: papañca + consciousness + emptiness + breath as one de-rendering sequence.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Coverage Strength	Notes
Papañca	Very high	MN 18 is essential
Consciousness	Very high	MN 38 is essential
Dependent arising	Very high	Especially MN 38
Emptiness/voidness	Very high	MN 121–122
Breath practice	Very high	MN 118
Contact	Very high	MN 18 and MN 38
Selfing loop	High	Consciousness, craving, papañca
Perception	Very high	Contact → perception → proliferation
Nibbāna/cessation	High	Through cessation, relinquishment, emptiness
Practice architecture	High	MN 118 plus voidness suttas
8. Editorial Review

This selected Majjhima Nikāya pack should be treated as the canonical root-system for the project.

It gives the direct sutta basis for nearly every later interpretive source:

MN 18 = papañca
MN 38 = consciousness without self
MN 121/122 = emptiness as lived de-occupation
MN 118 = breath as trainable re-rendering

The editorial danger is making the selection feel like a random anthology. It should be presented as one engine: contact proliferates, consciousness misreads itself, emptiness de-occupies the field, breath trains the system.

9. Variety Review

To avoid repetition:

Keep MN 18 essays sharp around papañca and conflict.
Keep MN 38 essays focused on consciousness and craving.
Keep MN 121/122 essays around voidness, seclusion, and non-occupancy.
Keep MN 118 essays practice-facing.
Pair with Ñāṇananda for interpretation, Ñāṇavīra for structural severity, Anālayo for satipaṭṭhāna, Ṭhānissaro for breath, and Nāgārjuna for emptiness.
10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

This is a selected-discourse pack, not the whole MN.
It needs commentary to become coherent for modern readers.
It does not provide the full poetic force of Sutta Nipāta or Udāna.
It does not give the massive system-map of Visuddhimagga.
It requires careful translation comparison where exact terms matter.

Patch with:

Ñāṇananda for papañca and Nibbāna.
Anālayo for satipaṭṭhāna scholarship.
Ṭhānissaro for breath practice.
Nāgārjuna for emptiness guardrails.
Buddhadāsa for immediate dependent arising.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source:

Saṃyutta Nikāya — Nidāna, Khandha, Saḷāyatana, and Suññata Saṃyuttas

Why: after the selected MN engine, the project needs the dense canonical network: dependent arising, aggregates, six sense bases, contact, feeling, emptiness, and non-self in repeated short discourses.

Buddhist Source Companion Blueprint
Saṃyutta Nikāya — Nidāna, Khandha, Saḷāyatana, and Suññata Clusters

Access status: strong open-access options. SuttaCentral hosts Bhikkhu Sujato’s Saṃyutta Nikāya translation; Access to Insight also indexes many SN translations and describes the collection as 2,889 suttas grouped by topic.

1. Source Identity

Source: Saṃyutta Nikāya, selected clusters
Core clusters: SN 12 Nidāna, SN 22 Khandha, SN 35 Saḷāyatana, plus emptiness/unconditioned-related selections.
Function: dense canonical network for dependent arising, aggregates, six sense bases, contact, feeling, non-self, and cessation.

2. Buddhist Lineage Placement

This is the canonical network-source.

Where the selected Majjhima Nikāya pack gives large set-piece discourses, the Saṃyutta Nikāya gives repeated short “modules”: dependent arising, aggregates, senses, contact, feeling, and release examined again and again from different angles.

It is the root matrix behind Ñāṇananda, Ñāṇavīra, Buddhadāsa, Anālayo, and Ṭhānissaro.

3. Structure Map
Cluster	Function
SN 12 Nidāna Saṃyutta	Dependent arising, cessation, middle way beyond existence/non-existence.
SN 22 Khandha Saṃyutta	Five aggregates as impermanent, unsatisfactory, not-self.
SN 35 Saḷāyatana Saṃyutta	Six sense bases, contact, feeling, sense-world construction.
SN 36 Vedanā Saṃyutta	Feeling as pleasant, painful, neutral; hinge before craving.
SN 43 Asaṅkhata Saṃyutta	The unconditioned named through cessation, dispassion, relinquishment.
4. Coverage Clusters
Cluster	Function
Dependent arising	Bondage and release as conditioned sequence
Aggregates	Personhood analyzed into processes
Sense bases	The world as sixfold contact-field
Contact	Event where world becomes experience
Feeling	Affective hinge before craving
Craving	Fuel of becoming
Non-self	No aggregate or sense process can be owned
Emptiness	Empty of self and what belongs to self
Middle way	Avoids existence/non-existence extremes
Unconditioned	Cessation-language without reification
5. Proposed Essay Sequence
The Dense Network of the Dhamma
Why the Saṃyutta Nikāya is a modular engine rather than a single grand discourse.
Nidāna: The World as Conditional Sequence
SN 12 as the backbone of bondage and release.
Kaccānagotta and the End of Metaphysical Extremes
The middle way beyond existence and non-existence.
Aggregates: The Self Taken Apart
SN 22 as direct analysis of the person into non-ownable processes.
The Sixfold World
SN 35 as perception, contact, and consciousness mapped through the six senses.
Feeling Before Craving
SN 36 as the hinge between bare affect and self-world renewal.
Contact Is the World’s Ignition Point
How sense base, object, and consciousness light up experience.
The Empty Village of the Body-Mind
Emptiness as absence of self and self-property.
The Unconditioned Without Metaphysics
SN 43 as cessation, dispassion, and relinquishment language.
Saṃyutta as Re-Rendering Atlas
How repeated short suttas train perception away from selfing.
6. Passage-Pack Targets
SN 12.1–12.2 — dependent arising and analysis of the links.
SN 12.15 Kaccānagotta — middle way beyond existence/non-existence.
SN 22.59 Anattalakkhaṇa-style aggregate analysis — form, feeling, perception, formations, consciousness as not-self.
SN 22.95 Foam simile — aggregates as insubstantial.
SN 35 selections — six sense bases, contact, gratification, drawback, escape.
SN 36 selections — feeling as conditionally known, not owned.
SN 43 selections — unconditioned as cessation, fading, relinquishment.
Cross-pack: dependent arising + aggregates + sense bases + feeling as one self-world mechanism.
7. Coverage Matrix
Imaginarium Concept	Strength	Notes
Dependent arising	Very high	SN 12 is core canonical base
Aggregates/not-self	Very high	SN 22 is essential
Sense-world construction	Very high	SN 35 is the main field
Contact	Very high	Repeated sixfold analysis
Feeling-tone	High	SN 36 gives the affective hinge
Craving/selfing	High	Built into dependent arising
Emptiness	High	Empty of self/self-property
Nibbāna/cessation	High	SN 43 and cessation sequences
Papañca	Medium	Less explicit than MN 18, but structurally relevant
De-rendering	Very high	Repeated dismantling of self-world assumptions
8. Editorial Review

This source pack is essential because it gives the project its canonical repetition engine.

The Majjhima Nikāya gives memorable long-form discourses. The Saṃyutta Nikāya gives repeated training-patterns: look at aggregates, senses, contact, feeling, craving, and consciousness until the assumption “this is me, mine, myself” becomes impossible to sustain.

For Path of Re-Rendering:

SN 12 explains the chain.
SN 22 removes the person.
SN 35 maps the rendered world.
SN 36 finds the affective hinge.
SN 43 names release without turning it into an object.

9. Variety Review

Do not let this become a generic “everything is impermanent” pack.

Rotate essays by mechanism:

conditionality,
aggregates,
senses,
contact,
feeling,
craving,
emptiness,
unconditioned,
non-ownership.

Pair with Ñāṇananda for phenomenology, Ñāṇavīra for self-view, Buddhadāsa for immediacy, Anālayo for observation, and Nāgārjuna for anti-reification.

10. Missing / Weak Coverage

Weak areas:

Not as narratively rich as the Majjhima Nikāya.
Not as poetic as Sutta Nipāta or Udāna.
Not a single systematic manual.
Can feel repetitive without editorial architecture.
Requires careful selection rather than attempting total coverage.

Patch with:

MN 18 / MN 38 / MN 121 / MN 118 for set-piece discourses.
Concept and Reality for papañca.
Satipaṭṭhāna for practice method.
MMK for emptiness dialectic.
Visuddhimagga for technical map.
11. Recommended Next Passage Packs

Next source:

Aṅguttara Nikāya — selected numerical teachings

Why: after the dense SN network, the project needs the numerical training architecture: one thing, two kinds, three feelings, four foundations, five aggregates, seven awakening factors, eightfold path, ten fetters — ideal for building clear modular essays on training, perception, craving, attention, and liberatio